Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 29. Mississippi Entertainment District Act

§ 17-29-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Entertainment District Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-29-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Business” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or sole proprietorship.

“Entertainment district” or “district” means an area designated by a county or municipality in which entertainment services are centered.

“Entertainment services” means any sale of tickets, passes, or admissions to an event, including, but not limited to, a sporting event, athletic event, festival, concert, or theater show.

“Entertainment facility” means any structure that provides entertainment services and shall include, but not be limited to, a theater, amphitheater, golf course, museum, zoo, automobile racetrack, arena, stadium, or similar venue.

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city, municipality, town or village in the state.

“Ticket fee” means an additional fee added on to the price of entertainment services sold.

“Qualifying business” means any business within an entertainment district that constructs and operates an entertainment facility that is established or remodeled after July 1, 2009, elects to participate in the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized by Section 17-29-7, and is approved to do so in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the State Tax Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 501, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-29-5.
Establishment of entertainment districts by governing authorities of municipalities and counties; application for approval of district to State Tax Commission.

The governing authorities of a municipality, by majority vote, may establish entertainment districts within its boundaries and shall designate the geographic area or areas in which a district shall be established. Following establishment of a district, application for approval of the entertainment district shall be made by the establishing municipality to the State Tax Commission which shall be required to approve the establishment and designation of the district within such municipality in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the State Tax Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 501, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-29-7.
Use of accelerated state income tax depreciation deduction by qualifying business authorized; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, qualifying businesses which construct or renovate an entertainment facility or facilities within an entertainment district after July 1, 2009, may use an accelerated state income tax depreciation deduction. The accelerated depreciation deduction shall be computed by accelerating depreciation period required by Title 35, Part III, Subpart 5, Chapter 4, Mississippi Administrative Code, to a five-year depreciation period.

Gaming establishments licensed under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall not be eligible for the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized under this section. Licensees under the Charitable Bingo Law shall not be eligible for the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized under this section, and the accelerated depreciation deduction shall not apply to any property utilized in the conduct of charitable bingo under the Charitable Bingo Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 501, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-29-9.
Qualifying businesses electing to use accelerated depreciation deduction to impose ticket fee on entertainment services provided by the business; collection of fees; enforcement.

Any qualifying business that elects to utilize the accelerated depreciation deduction provided in Section 17-29-7 shall impose a ticket fee on any entertainment services provided by the qualifying business in the amount of Two Dollars ($2.00) per ticket, pass or admission, as applicable, in addition to the tax levied by Section 27-65-22.

The fee shall be collected by and paid to the Mississippi State Tax Commission on a form prescribed by the State Tax Commission in the manner that state sales taxes are collected and paid; and full enforcement provisions and all other provisions of Chapter 65, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply as necessary to the implementation and administration of this section. The revenue collected by the State Tax Commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund.

The ticket fee shall be charged and collected for a period of five (5) years from the date a qualifying business elects to utilize the accelerated depreciation deduction authorized in Section 17-29-7.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 501, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.